test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-AN-iskwew_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - iskwêw - ok : # -m animate noun
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg: iskwêw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl: iskwêwak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Loc: iskwênâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Obv: iskwêwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [iskwês, iskwêsis]
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [iskwêsak, iskwêsisak]
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitiskwêm
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitiskwêm
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otiskwêma
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otiskwêmiyiwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitiskwêminân
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitiskwêminaw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitiskwêmiwâw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otiskwêmiwâwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otiskwêmiyiwa
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitiskwêmak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitiskwêmak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otiskwêma
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otiskwêmiyiwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitiskwêminânak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitiskwêminawak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitiskwêmiwâwak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otiskwêmiwâwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otiskwêmiyiwa
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niciskwêmis
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiciskwêmis
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ociskwêmisa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: ociskwêmisiyiwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niciskwêmisinân
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiciskwêmisinaw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiciskwêmisiwâw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ociskwêmisiwâwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: ociskwêmisiyiwa
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niciskwêmisak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiciskwêmisak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: ociskwêmisa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: ociskwêmisiyiwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niciskwêmisinânak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiciskwêmisinawak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiciskwêmisiwâwak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: ociskwêmisiwâwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: ociskwêmisiyiwa
     
